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−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−65

1FZ−FEENGINESUP(RM619E)

DTC P 1200/78FuelPumpRelay/ECUCircuitMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
In the diagram below, when the engine is cranked, current flows from terminal ST of the ignition switch to
the starter relay coil and also current flows to terminal STA of the engine ECU (STA signal).
When the STA signal and NE signal are input to the engine ECU, Tr1 is turned ON, current flows to coil of
the circuit opening relay, the relay switches on, power is supplied to the fuel pump and the fuel pump oper-
ates. While the NE signal is generated (engine running), the engine ECU keeps Tr1 ON (circuit opening relay
ON) and the fuel pump also keeps operating. The fuel pump speed is controlled at two levels (high speed
or low speed) by the condition of the engine (starting, light load, heavy load). When the engine starts (STA
ON), Tr2 in the engine ECU is OFF, so the fuel pump relay closes and battery voltage is applied directly to
the fuel pump. Fuel pump operates at high speed. After the engine starts during idling or light loads, since
Tr2 goes ON, power is supplied to the fuel pump via the fuel pump resistor. Fuel pump operates at low speed.
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DI−66
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE

1FZ−FEENGINESUP(RM619E)

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1200/78 Openorshort in fuelpumprelaycircuit
SOpenorshort in fuelpumprelaycircuit
SFuelpumprelay
SEngineECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
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START FPR1 (+)

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−67

1FZ−FE ENGINE SUP (RM619E)

HINT:
This diagnostic chart is based on premise that engine is started. If the engine is not started, proceed to prob-
lem symptoms table on DI−21.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

1 Check voltage between terminal FPR1 of engine ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPR1 of the engine ECU
connector and body ground while racing engine.
OK:

Time after engine started Voltage

Less than 60 seconds 9 � 14V

60 seconds or more 0 � 3 V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

2 Check operation of fuel pump relay (Marking: FUEL/PMP) (See page FI−46).

NG Replace fuel pump relay.

OK

Repair or replace harness or connector
between fuel pump relay and engine ECU.


